Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-335.01
Licensed dealer, defined.

Licensed dealer means a motor vehicle dealer, motorcycle dealer, or trailer dealer licensed under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Laws 2017, LB263, § 26.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.